dictionaries/isv_latcyr_hunspell_dict.dic
прєразказати/LB
одєти/LC
многы/LD
мати/LE
волгкы/LF
јести/LG
сјести/LG
чијколи/LH
чтоколи/LI
какыколи/LJ
кторыколи/LJ
језыкотворјенје/LK
језыкотворство/LL
согласје/LK
сугласје/LK
тојже/LM
кенгуру/LN
носилка/LO
жолв/LP
боа/LQ
којколи/LH
ктоколи/LR
нарєчена/LS
слыти/LC
обув/LP
знајема/LS
дорастла/LS
возрастла/LS
запета/LS
крива/LS
најести/LG
објести/LG
зебу/LN
прємєнна/LS
разјести/LG
